Maryland, session 2026, HB1286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1002.
(a) There is a barbershop and beauty salon beer [and], wine, AND LIQUOR
license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a holder of:
(1) a barbershop permit issued under § 4–501 of the Business Occupations
and Professions Article; or
(2) a beauty salon permit issued under § 5–501 of the Business Occupations
and Professions Article.
– 1 –

Ch. 847 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) The license authorizes the license holder to provide TO A CUSTOMER DURING
ANY ONE VISIT not more than 12 ounces of beer [or], 5 ounces of wine by the glass, OR 1.7
OUNCES OF LIQUOR for on–premises consumption by a THE barbershop or beauty salon
customer:
(1) when the customer is being provided:
(i) a barbering service under Title 4 of the Business Occupations
and Professions Article; or
(ii) a cosmetology service under Title 5 of the Business Occupations
and Professions Article; or
(2) while the customer is attending a fund–raising event at the barbershop
or beauty salon.
(d) A license holder may serve beer [and], wine, AND LIQUOR for on–premises
consumption during normal business hours but not later than 9 p.m.
(e) A license holder need not obtain a Sunday license under § 11–2004 of this title
to provide beer [and], wine, AND LIQUOR on Sunday.
(f) The annual license fee is $100.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –